New York, session 2025-2026, S5421.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision (c) of schedule III of section 3306 of the 2 public health law is amended by adding a new paragraph 15 to read as 3 follows: 4 (15) Xylazine (N-(2,6-dimethylphenyl)-5,6-dihydro-4H-1,3 thiazin-2- 5 amine), including its salts, isomers and salts of isomers whenever the 6 existence of such salts, isomers and salts of isomers is possible within 7 the specific chemical designation. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 9 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09071-01-5